sc_IT/sc_IT/sc_IT.dic
acadèssere/I po:verbu
acòllere/I po:verbu
acontèssere/I po:verbu
acràere/I po:verbu
addùghere/I po:verbu
aèschere/I po:verbu
agiùnghere/I po:verbu
agradèssere/I po:verbu
allùghere/I po:verbu
ammalèschere/I po:verbu
ammìtere/I po:verbu
ammustèrchere/I po:verbu
annànghere/I po:verbu
aparèssere/I po:verbu
apòrrere/I po:verbu
arrèere/I po:verbu
arrendo/I po:verbu st:arrèndere 
arrèschere/I po:verbu
arròschere/I po:verbu
arruèschere/I po:verbu
assìstere/I po:verbu
assòlvere/I po:verbu
assùmere/I po:verbu
astrìnghere/I po:verbu
atèndere/I po:verbu
atràere/I po:verbu
atzèdere/I po:verbu
avalèssere/I po:verbu
avèrtere/I po:verbu
bàere/I po:verbu
bèndere/I po:verbu
beneìghere/I po:verbu
bìere/I po:verbu
bìvere/I po:verbu
càbere/I po:verbu
candèssere/I po:verbu
chìnghere/I po:verbu
combìnchere/I po:verbu
concòghere/I po:verbu
confùndere/I po:verbu
connètere/I po:verbu
contraìghere/I po:verbu
corrispòndere/I po:verbu
corrùmpere/I po:verbu
costrùere/I po:verbu
crèere/I po:verbu
cròere/I po:verbu
cùbere/I po:verbu
cumbèrtere/I po:verbu
cummìtere/I po:verbu
cumpadèssere/I po:verbu
cumpràghere/I po:verbu
cumpromìtere/I po:verbu
cuncùrrere/I po:verbu
cunsìstere/I po:verbu
cuntzèrnere/I po:verbu
cunvìvere/I po:verbu
cùrrere/I po:verbu
custrìnghere/I po:verbu
decadesso/I po:verbu st:decadèssere 
dèghere/I po:verbu
delùdere/I po:verbu
dèpere/I po:verbu
descadèssere/I po:verbu
deslùghere/I po:verbu
desvanèssere/I po:verbu
devènnere/I po:verbu
devòlvere/I po:verbu
difèndere/I po:verbu
dimìtere/I po:verbu
dirìgere/I po:verbu
disconnòschere/I po:verbu
discumpàrrere/I po:verbu
disintèndere/I po:verbu
dispìdere/I po:verbu
dissòlvere/I po:verbu
distràere/I po:verbu
divìdere/I po:verbu
elègere/I po:verbu
emìtere/I po:verbu
esclùdere/I po:verbu
esìgere/I po:verbu
espèllere/I po:verbu
esprìmere/I po:verbu
estremèssere/I po:verbu
etzèdere/I po:verbu
favorèssere/I po:verbu
fortalèssere/I po:verbu
frànghere/I po:verbu
fringo/I po:verbu st:frìnghere 
frùtere/I po:verbu
fùtere/I po:verbu
giùghere/I po:verbu
gradèssere/I po:verbu
imbàtere/I po:verbu
imbèrghere/I po:verbu
inchèndere/I po:verbu
inclùdere/I po:verbu
incrùere/I po:verbu
indùrghere/I po:verbu
infùndere/I po:verbu
insìstere/I po:verbu
intertènnere/I po:verbu
intìnghere/I po:verbu
intraprèndere/I po:verbu
introdùere/I po:verbu
isbàtere/I po:verbu
iscadèssere/I po:verbu
iscarèssere/I po:verbu
iscàrpere/I po:verbu
isciòllere/I po:verbu
iscràere/I po:verbu
iscrèere/I po:verbu
iscrùfere/I po:verbu
iscummìtere/I po:verbu
iscùrrere/I po:verbu
isfùtere/I po:verbu
ismerèssere/I po:verbu
isòrvere/I po:verbu
ispàrghere/I po:verbu
ispèrdere/I po:verbu
ispòndere/I po:verbu
isprèmere/I po:verbu
istabilèssere/I po:verbu
istèrrere/I po:verbu
istìnghere/I po:verbu
istòmbere/I po:verbu
istrìnghere/I po:verbu
làmbere/I po:verbu
lèdere/I po:verbu
lìnghere/I po:verbu
lùghere/I po:verbu
maleìghere/I po:verbu
mìntere/I po:verbu
mòere/I po:verbu
mòrdere/I po:verbu
mòvere/I po:verbu
mùrghere/I po:verbu
nòghere/I po:verbu
ochìere/I po:verbu
ofèndere/I po:verbu
oprìmere/I po:verbu
orròschere/I po:verbu
padèssere/I po:verbu
pèndere/I po:verbu
permìtere/i po:verbu
permito/i po:verbu st:permìtere 
persìstere/I po:verbu
pìnghere/I po:verbu
pòrgere/I po:verbu
possèdere/I po:verbu
pràndere/I po:verbu
prèmere/I po:verbu
prènere/I po:verbu
prescrìere/I po:verbu
presèdere/I po:verbu
pretèndere/I po:verbu
prevàlere/I po:verbu
prevìdere/I po:verbu
prodùsere/I po:verbu
promòvere/I po:verbu
protzèdere/I po:verbu
pudèschere/I po:verbu
pùnghere/I po:verbu
rànchere/I po:verbu
rechèdere/I po:verbu
reconnòschere/I po:verbu
redùsere/I po:verbu
règhere/I po:verbu
regollo/I po:verbu st:regòllere 
remito/I po:verbu st:remìtere 
renesso/I po:verbu st:renèssere 
reprodùere/I po:verbu
resèssere/I po:verbu
resìstere/I po:verbu
respòndere/I po:verbu
resùmere/I po:verbu
revèntere/I po:verbu
ricùrrere/I po:verbu
rìere/I po:verbu
rimovo/I po:verbu st:rimòvere 
risòrgere/I po:verbu
ròere/I po:verbu
rugo/I po:verbu st:rùghere 
sabèschere/I po:verbu
sapesco/I po:verbu st:sapèschere 
sèrpere/I po:verbu
sòlere/I po:verbu
subèrghere/I po:verbu
subrabìvere/I po:verbu
subravìvere/I po:verbu
sucùmbere/I po:verbu
sùere/I po:verbu
suigo/I po:verbu st:suìghere 
suspèndere/I po:verbu
sutamìtere/I po:verbu
sutràere/I po:verbu
tèndere/I po:verbu
tèssere/I po:verbu
tìnghere/I po:verbu
tòrchere/I po:verbu
tràere/I po:verbu
tralugo/I po:verbu st:tralùghere 
trascrìere/I po:verbu
trasèndere/I po:verbu
trasparèssere/I po:verbu
trèghere/I po:verbu
tròddere/I po:verbu
tùmbere/I po:verbu
tzèdere/I po:verbu
tzircuscrìere/I po:verbu
ùmprere/I po:verbu
